Massachusetts, session 194th, H4784.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Select Board of the Town of Hopedale shall appoint a Town
Administrator whose compensation and benefits are to be determined through a contract entered
into pursuant to and in accordance with G. L. c. 41§ 108N.
SECTION 2. The Town Administrator shall be appointed solely on the basis of executive
and administrative qualifications and shall be a person of proven ability and previous experience
in municipal administration consistent with the expected performance of the duties of the office.
Such person shall devote full time to the office and shall not hold any other public office,
elective or appointive, nor shall engage in any other business, occupation or profession during
the term of office which would deprive him/her from devoting full time to his/her duties during
normal working hours. The Town may, from time to time, through by-law, establish such
additional qualifications as it deems necessary and appropriate.
of 5

SECTION 3. The Town Administrator shall be the chief administrative officer of the
Town of Hopedale with the powers and duties as follows:
(A) Said Administrator shall be responsible to the Select Board for the efficient
administration and coordination of all matters that come under the jurisdiction of the Select
Board.
(B) Said Administrator shall be responsible for the implementation of all policies,
directives and votes of the Select Board.
(C) Said Administrator shall have access to all town books, papers, and records for
information necessary for the proper performance of his/her duties.
(D) Said Administrator shall administer the personnel policies and bylaws of the Town.
(E) Said Administrator shall be responsible for the preparation of the annual budget for
all Town agencies under the jurisdiction of the Select Board.
(F) Said Administrator shall be responsible for the preparation and format of a uniform
budget document for all departments or agencies of the Town for presentation to the Select
Board and shall also be responsible for development and updating of an annual capital
improvement program.
(G) Said Administrator shall keep the Select Board informed as to the financial needs of
the Town and shall make such recommendations to the Select Board as he/she deems necessary
or expedient.
of 5

(H) Said Administrator shall be responsible for the review of all current by-laws,
regulations and policies that affect the departments and agencies of the Town and shall make
such recommendations for changes as he/she deems necessary.
(I) Said Administrator shall see that all provisions of General Laws, bylaws, and votes of
the Town Meeting and of the Select Board which require enforcement, direction and supervision
of the Town Administrator's office are faithfully carried out, performed and executed.
J)Said Administrator shall be responsible for the purchase of all supplies, materials and
equipment, except for books and educational materials for schools and books and other media for
libraries and shall approve the award of all contracts for all departments, boards or agencies of
the Town.
(K)Said Administrator shall be responsible for the negotiation of all contracts which the
select Board is authorized by law to enter into. Such contracts shall be subject to final approval
and execution by the Select Board.
(L)Said Administrator shall seek and evaluate candidates for all jobs or positions subject
to appointment by the Select Board, other than the Administrator, Counsel, or positions filled
pursuant to Chapter 31 of the General Laws. The Administrator shall submit to the Select Board
a list of three names, or fewer if less than three applicants, for each such appointment, ranked in
order of his/her preference and said Board may fill such position(s) only from such list.
(M) Said Town Administrator shall fix the compensation of all Town officers and
employees appointed by the TOWN Administrator with the limits established by existing
appropriation, by-law or collective bargaining agreement.
of 5

(N) Said Administrator shall be responsible for recommending reorganization changes in
Town Government to the Select Board, including consolidation or abolishment of municipal
departments, boards, agencies, or other branches of Town government, which reorganization
changes may ultimately be within the jurisdiction of the Select Board or Town Meeting as to
approval and implementation.
(O) Said Town Administrator shall administer the municipal insurance programs.
(P) Said Administrator shall attend all regular and special meetings of the Select Board,
unless requested and allowed to be excused, and shall have a voice, but no vote, in all of its
discussions.
(Q) Said Administrator shall attend all sessions of the Town Meeting and shall be
available to answer all questions concerning matters before the Meeting which questions are
directed to the office and relate to matters under his/her general jurisdiction. Notwithstanding
residence, the Administrator shall be permitted to speak at any Town Meeting on any matter
before said meeting.
(R) Said Town Administrator may at any time inquire into the conduct in office of any
officer or employee or department, board or commission under the jurisdiction of his/her office
or that of the Select Board.
(S) Said Administrator shall perform any other lawful duties required by by-law or by
majority vote of the Select Board.
SECTION 4. The Select Board, by affirmative vote of at least a majority if its elected
members, may, for good cause, remove the Town Administrator from office, in accordance with
of 5

any requirements and procedures of his/her contract under G.L. c. 41, § 108N, if any. At a
minimum said Administrator shall be given due written notice of the cause(s) for removal and
shall be given a due process hearing, public or private at the option of the Administrator, with a
full opportunity to be heard.
SECTION 5. If the office of Town Administrator is vacant because of death, removal,
resignation or otherwise, or if the Administrator is on extended
leave of absence, the Select Board, by affirmative vote of at least a majority of the elected
Select Board members, may appoint a suitable person to serve as temporary Town
Administrator. Such temporary appointment may not exceed three months, but one renewal not
to exceed three months may be voted. Said temporary Town Administrator shall receive
compensation as set by the affirmative vote of the Select Board but shall not exceed the rate of
compensation approved for the Administrator on leave or otherwise unavailable.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 5